incubator/apertium-ckt/tests/tests.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../tyv.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../tyv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

      
  "Nouns in -ӈы":
    ӄораӈы<n><sp><erg> : ӄаата
    ӄораӈы<n><sp><ins> : ӄаата
    ӄораӈы<n><sg><abs> : ӄораӈы
    титиӈы<n><sp><erg> : тититэ
    титиӈы<n><sp><ins> : тититэ
    титиӈы<n><sg><abs> : титиӈы

  "Bare stem, deleted final vowel":
    экык<n><sp><all> : аккагты
    экык<n><sg><abs> : экык
    экык<n><sp><erg> : эккэтэ
    экык<n><sp><ins> : эккэтэ

  "Singulative":
    уунъыт<n><sing><sg><abs> : оонъылгын
    
